Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-2832
Claims; paid; procedure; limitation.

(1) The Director of Administrative Services shall issue a warrant drawn on the fund in the amount of each claim submitted by the director. All claims against the fund shall be made on a voucher or other appropriate request by the director after he or she has received:

(a) A certified copy of a final judgment in excess of eight hundred thousand dollars against a health care provider and in excess of the amount recoverable from all health care providers;

(b) A certified copy of a court-approved settlement in excess of eight hundred thousand dollars against a health care provider and in excess of the amount recoverable from all health care providers; or

(c) In case of claims based on primary insurance issued by the risk manager under sections 44-2837 to 44-2839, a certified copy of a final judgment or court-approved settlement requiring payment from the fund.

(2) The amount paid from the fund for excess liability when added to the payments by all health care providers may not exceed the maximum amount recoverable pursuant to subsection (1) of section 44-2825. The amount paid from the fund on account of a primary insurance policy issued by the risk manager to a health care provider under sections 44-2837 to 44-2839 may not exceed eight hundred thousand dollars for any one occurrence covered by such policy under any circumstances.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 32;

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 13;

Laws 1986, LB 1005, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 998, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 61.